Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.550

Annexation—Election—Favorable vote.

An election on the annexation of territory to a metropolitan municipal corporation shall be conducted and canvassed in the same manner as provided for the conduct of an election on the formation of a metropolitan municipal corporation except that notice of such election shall be published in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the territory proposed to be annexed and the ballot proposition shall be in substantially the following form:

ANNEXATION TO (here insert name of

metropolitan municipal corporation).

"Shall the territory described in a resolution of the metropolitan council of (here insert name of metropolitan municipal corporation) adopted on the . . . . . . . . . ., 19. . ., be annexed to such incorporation?

YES . . . .

□

NO . . . .

□"

If a majority of those voting on such proposition vote in favor thereof, the territory shall thereupon be annexed to the metropolitan municipal corporation.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.58.550. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 55.]

NOTES:

Canvassing returns, generally: Chapter 29A.60 RCW.

Conduct of elections—Canvass: RCW 29A.60.010.